en: Ink application technique: Ink application; Screen printing; Stenciling; Other
pt-BR: Técnica de aplicação de tinta: Aplicação de tinta; Impressão de tela; Estêncil; Outro
es: Técnica de aplicación de tinta: Aplicación de tinta; Serigrafía; Estarcido; Otros
zh-CN: 油墨应用技术: 油墨应用; 丝网印刷; 模板印刷; 其他
zh-TW: 油墨應用技術: 油墨應用; 網版印刷; 模板印刷; 其他
hu: Tintafelviteli technika: Tinta alkalmazása; Szitanyomás; Stencilezés; Egyéb
da: Blækpåføringsteknik: Blækpåføring; Skærmprint; Stencilering; Andet
nl: Inkttoepassingstechniek: Inkttoepassing; Zeefdruk; Sjabloneren; Andere
cs: Technika nanášení inkoustu: Aplikace inkoustu; Sítotisk; Šablonování; Jiné
ru: Техника нанесения чернил: Нанесение чернил; Трафаретная печать; Трафарет; Другая
hr-HR: Tehnika nanošenja tinte: Primjena tinte; Sitotisak; Šabloniranje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Техника на нанасяне на мастило: Нанасяне на мастило; Ситопечат; Шаблониране; Други
ro-RO: Tehnică aplicare cerneală: Aplicare cerneală; Imprimare serigrafică; Șabloane; Altele
tr: Mürekkep uygulama tekniği: Mürekkep uygulaması; Film baskısı; Kalıplama; Diğer
vi: Kỹ thuật bôi mực: Dùng mực; In lụa; Tô khuôn; Khác
el: Τεχνική εφαρμογής μελανιού: Εφαρμογή μελανιού; Μεταξοτυπία; Στένσιλ; Άλλο
sv: Bläckappliceringsteknik: Bläckapplikation; Skärmavbildning; Stencilering; Övrigt
sl-SI: Tehnika nanašanja črnila: Aplikacija črnila; Sitotisk; Šabloniranje; Drugo
lt-LT: Rašalo taikymo metodas: Rašalo naudojimas; Trafaretinis spausdintuvas; Trafaretas; Kita
de: Tintenaufbringungstechnik: Farbauftrag; Siebdruck; Schablonieren; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Técnica de aplicação de tinta: Aplicação de tinta; Serigrafia; Aplicação de estênceis; Outro
fi: Musteen levitystekniikka: Musteen käyttö; Silkkipainatus; Sapluunan käyttö; Muu
nb: Blekkpåføringsteknikk: Blekkpåføring; Skjermtrykk; Stensilering; Annet
ja: インク塗布の技術: インク塗布; スクリーン印刷; ステンシル; その他
sk-SK: Technika nanášania atramentu: Aplikácia atramentu; Sieťotlač; Šablónovanie; Iné
th: เทคนิคการใช้หมึก: การประยุกต์ใช้หมึก; งานพิมพ์ซิลค์สกรีน; การฉลุลวดลาย; อื่นๆ
ko: 잉크 도포 기법: 잉크 도포; 스크린 인쇄; 스텐실링; 기타
pl: Technika aplikacji tuszu: Nakładanie atramentu; Sitodruk; Tworzenie szablonów; Inne
it: Tecnica di applicazione dell'inchiostro: Applicazione dell'inchiostro; Serigrafia; Stencil; Altro
fr: Technique d’application de l’encre: Application de l’encre; Impression d’écran; Sérigraphie; Autre